Hawaii, session 2026, HB2357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter Artificial intelligence music artists §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that, for explicit or implicit objectives, infers from inputs how to generate outputs, such as predictions, content, recommendations, or decisions, that influence real or virtual environments. "Artificial intelligence music artist" means a persona that is not a natural person, created through artificial intelligence, and marketed, distributed, or promoted as a musical performer or recording artist. "Music streaming platform" means a website, application, or other digital interface accessible to the public that offers a catalogue of music or other audio-based content. §   -2  Artificial intelligence music artists; streaming platforms; prohibited.  No music streaming platform shall host, distribute, or otherwise make available in the State music performed or attributed to an artificial intelligence music artist. §   -3 Rules; enforcement.  (a) The department of the attorney general shall have exclusive authority to enforce this chapter and adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. (b) Any violation of this chapter shall constitute unfair methods of competition and unfair and deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce under section 480-2." PART II SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of agriculture to use artificial intelligence to support the agricultural industry. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. PART III SECTION 3.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE disclosures §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that, for explicit or implicit objectives, infers from inputs how to generate outputs, such as predictions, content, recommendations, or decisions, that influence real or virtual environments. "Tangible product" means anything created with the use of artificial intelligence.  "Tangible product" includes audio and audio visual. §   -2 Artificial intelligence; tangible products; prohibition; disclosures. No person, business, company, or other entity shall produce, circulate, publish, distribute, communicate, or otherwise make available in the State any tangible product that is created with the use of artificial intelligence unless the tangible product includes a clear and conspicuous disclosure that artificial intelligence was used to create the tangible product. §   -3 Rules; enforcement.  (a) The department of the attorney general shall have exclusive authority to enforce this chapter and adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. (b) Any violation of this chapter shall constitute unfair methods of competition and unfair and deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce under section 480-2." PART IV SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________